District of Columbia statutes.
46-353.01

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this subchapter applies to all proceedings under this chapter.

(b)

An individual petitioner or a support enforcement agency may initiate a proceeding authorized under this chapter by filing a petition in an initiating tribunal for forwarding to a responding tribunal or by filing a petition or a comparable pleading directly in a tribunal of another state or

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 301, 63 DCR 222

History